Hawaii statutes.
§122A-15 Immunities. (a) No member of
the Hawaii state defense force, while in the active service of the State or
while going to or returning from the place where the member is required to be
while performing that service, shall be arrested on any warrant except for
treason or felony, or required to serve upon any jury or posse comitatus.

(b) No member of the Hawaii state defense
force shall be civilly liable for any act or omission occurring while in the
active service of the State if that act or omission shall have been in the line
of duty and in compliance with lawful military orders. [L 1987, c 35, pt of §1;
am L 1988, c 135, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next